Hawaii statutes.
[§586-26] Penalties. Any violation of
a foreign protective order entitled to full faith and credit under this part is
a misdemeanor. The court shall sentence a person convicted under this section
as follows:

(1) For a first conviction for violation of the
protective order, the person shall serve a mandatory minimum jail sentence of
forty-eight hours but not more than thirty days and be fined not less than $150
nor more than $500; provided that the court shall not sentence a defendant to
pay a fine unless the defendant is or will be able to pay the fine; and

(2) For a second and any subsequent conviction for
violation of the protective order, the person shall serve a mandatory minimum
jail sentence of thirty days and be fined not less than $250 nor more than
$1,000; provided that the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine
unless the defendant is or will be able to pay the fine.

Upon conviction and sentencing of the defendant, the
court shall order that the defendant immediately be incarcerated to serve the
mandatory minimum sentence imposed; provided that the defendant may be admitted
to bail pending appeal pursuant to chapter 804. The court may stay the
imposition of the sentence if special circumstances exist. [L 2000, c 186, pt
of §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next